District of Columbia statutes.
21-2032

Notice; waiver.

A person, including a guardian, guardian ad litem, conservator, or other fiduciary, may waive notice by a signed writing. An individual for whom a guardianship or other protective order is sought, a ward, or a protected individual may not waive notice.

History

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-2032.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1-402 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act (1982 Act).